Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 7. General Powers and Duties of School Boards.
§ 22.1-79.3.
Policies regarding certain activities.

Local school boards shall develop and implement policies to ensure that public school students are not required to convey or deliver any materials that (i) advocate the election or defeat of any candidate for elective office, (ii) advocate the passage or defeat of any referendum question, or (iii) advocate the passage or defeat of any matter pending before a local school board, local governing body or the General Assembly of Virginia or the Congress of the United States.Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the discussion or use of political or issue-oriented materials as part of classroom discussions or projects or to prohibit the delivery of informational materials.

Local school boards shall develop and implement policies to prohibit the administration of questionnaires or surveys to public school students during the regular school day or at school-sponsored events without written, informed parental consent for the student’s participation when participation in such questionnaire or survey may subsequently result in the sale for commercial purposes of personal information regarding the individual student.

In any case in which a questionnaire or survey requesting that students provide sexual information, mental health information, medical information, information on student health risk behaviors pursuant to §

32.1-73.8

, other information on controlled substance use, or any other information that the school board deems to be sensitive in nature is to be administered, the school board shall notify the parent concerning the administration of such questionnaire or survey in writing not less than 30 days prior to its administration. The notice shall inform the parent regarding the nature and types of questions included in the questionnaire or survey, the purposes and age-appropriateness of the questionnaire or survey, how information collected by the questionnaire or survey will be used, who will have access to such information, the steps that will be taken to protect student privacy, and whether and how any findings or results will be disclosed. In any case in which a questionnaire or survey is required by state law or is requested by a state agency, the relevant state agency shall provide the school board with all information required to be included in the notice to parents. The parent shall have the right to review the questionnaire or survey in a manner mutually agreed upon by the school and the parent and exempt his child from participating in the questionnaire or survey. Unless required by federal or state law or regulation, school personnel administering any such questionnaire or survey shall not disclose personally identifiable information.

No questionnaire or survey requesting that students provide sexual information shall be administered to any student in kindergarten through grade six.

Local school boards shall develop and implement policies to advise the parent of each student enrolled in the school division of the availability of information in the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry and the location of the website. Local school boards shall also develop protocols governing the release of children to persons who are not their parent.

No local school board providing access and opportunity to use school facilities or to distribute literature may deny equal access or fair opportunity to use such school facilities or to distribute literature, or otherwise discriminate against the Boy Scouts of America or the Girl Scouts of the USA.Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require any school or school division to sponsor the Boy Scouts of America or the Girl Scouts of the USA, or to exempt any such groups from school board policies governing access to and use of school facilities and distribution of literature.

Local school boards shall develop and implement policies to allow a parent of twins or higher order multiples in the same grade level to request that the children be placed in the same classroom or in separate classrooms if they are at the same elementary school. Such policies shall also provide that (i) schools may recommend classroom placement to the parent; (ii) schools must provide the placement requested by the children’s parent, unless the division superintendent or his designee makes a classroom placement determination following the school principal’s request in accordance with this subsection; (iii) a parent must request the classroom placement no later than three days after the first day of each school year or three days after the first day of attendance of the children during a school year; and (iv) at the end of the initial grading period, if the school principal, in consultation with the children’s classroom teacher, determines that the requested classroom placement is disruptive to the school or is harmful to the children’s educational progress, the school principal may request that the division superintendent or his designee determine the children’s classroom placement.

Local school boards may adopt and implement policies pursuant to which electronic records and electronic signatures may be accepted from any parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of a child enrolled in the relevant school division, provided such policies are consistent with the provisions of Chapter 42.1 (§ 59.1-479 et seq.) of Title 59.1.

Local school boards may develop a single, standardized form to obtain parental consent for the release of student data. If developed by the local school board, such form shall be used by Community Policy and Management Teams and the Departments of Health, Social Services, Juvenile Justice, and Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

History.

2000, c. 1063; 2001, cc. 688, 820; 2002, c. 160; 2003, c. 693; 2006, cc. 145, 857, 914; 2009, c. 195; 2011, cc. 261, 726; 2012, c. 546; 2015, c. 703.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Correctional Education,” was deleted from subsection H to conform to changes made by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, enactments 99 and 100.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 160 designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A and added subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 693 added subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 145 added the second through last sentences in subsection B.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and added subsection C; and inserted the D designation at the beginning of the penultimate paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 195 added subsection E.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 261 added subsection F. Subsection F was redesignated G at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2011 amendment by c. 726 added subsection C and redesignated former subsections C through E as present subsections D through F.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 546 added subsection H, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 703, in subsection A, substituted “Local school boards” for “No later than January 1, 2001, local school boards” in the first paragraph and “Nothing in this subsection shall” for “This section shall not” in the second paragraph; inserted the subsection C designation and rewrote the former text and former subsection C, to combine the development and implementation of guidelines on parental notice of student surveys on sexual information with the surveys on student health risk behaviors; added subsection D; redesignated former subsections D through H as subsections E through I; and substituted “website” for “Internet website” in subsection E.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 22.1-79.4.
Threat assessment teams and oversight committees.

Each local school board shall adopt policies for the establishment of threat assessment teams, including the assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior may pose a threat to the safety of school staff or students consistent with the model policies developed by the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety (the Center) in accordance with §

9.1-184

. Such policies shall include procedures for referrals to community services boards or health care providers for evaluation or treatment, when appropriate.

The superintendent of each school division may establish a committee charged with oversight of the threat assessment teams operating within the division, which may be an existing committee established by the division. The committee shall include individuals with expertise in human resources, education, school administration, mental health, and law enforcement.

Each division superintendent shall establish, for each school, a threat assessment team that shall include persons with expertise in counseling, instruction, school administration, and law enforcement and, in the case of any school in which a school resource officer is employed, at least one such school resource officer. Threat assessment teams may be established to serve one or more schools as determined by the division superintendent. Each team shall (i) provide guidance to students, faculty, and staff regarding recognition of threatening or aberrant behavior that may represent a threat to the community, school, or self; (ii) identify members of the school community to whom threatening behavior should be reported; and (iii) implement policies adopted by the local school board pursuant to subsection A.

Upon a preliminary determination that a student poses a threat of violence or physical harm to self or others, a threat assessment team shall immediately report its determination to the division superintendent or his designee. The division superintendent or his designee shall immediately attempt to notify the student’s parent or legal guardian. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude school division personnel from acting immediately to address an imminent threat.

Each threat assessment team established pursuant to this section shall collect and report to the Center quantitative data on its activities using the case management tool developed by the Center.

Upon a preliminary determination by the threat assessment team that an individual poses a threat of violence to self or others or exhibits significantly disruptive behavior or need for assistance, a threat assessment team may obtain criminal history record information, as provided in §§

19.2-389

and

19.2-389.1

, and health records, as provided in §

32.1-127.1:03

. No member of a threat assessment team shall redisclose any criminal history record information or health information obtained pursuant to this section or otherwise use any record of an individual beyond the purpose for which such disclosure was made to the threat assessment team.

History.

2013, c. 710; 2014, cc. 7, 158; 2016, c. 554; 2019, cc. 39, 456; 2022, c. 769.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 7 and 158 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety” for “Virginia Center for School Safety.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 554, in subsection A, substituted “intervention with individuals” for “intervention with students”; and added subsection F.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 39 and 456 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “(the Center)”; rewrote subsection E, which read: “Each threat assessment team established pursuant to this section shall report quantitative data on its activities according to guidance developed by the Department of Criminal Justice Services.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 769, inserted ”and, in the case of any school in which a school resource officer is employed, at least one such school resource officer” in subsection C.

§ 22.1-79.5.
Policy regarding tobacco and nicotine vapor products.

Each school board shall develop and implement a policy to prohibit, at any time, the use and distribution of any tobacco product or nicotine vapor product, as those terms are defined in §

18.2-371.2

, on a school bus, on school property, or at an on-site or off-site school-sponsored activity.

Such policy shall include (i) provisions for its enforcement among students, employees, and visitors, including the enumeration of possible sanctions or disciplinary action consistent with state or federal law, and (ii) referrals to resources to help staff and students overcome tobacco addiction.

Each school board shall work to ensure adequate notice of this policy.

History.

2014, c. 326; 2019, cc. 172, 246.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 326, cl. 2 provides: “That each school board shall update its policies and code of student conduct to comply with the provisions of this act by July 1, 2015.”

The 2019 amendments by cc. 172 and 246 are identical, and rewrote the section, which read: “Each school board shall develop and implement a policy to prohibit the use of electronic cigarettes on a school bus, on school property, or at a school-sponsored activity.”

§ 22.1-79.6.
Employee lactation support policy.

Each local school board shall adopt a policy to set aside, in each school in the school division, a non-restroom location that is shielded from the public view to be designated as an area in which any mother who is employed by the local school board or enrolled as a student may take breaks of reasonable length during the school day to express milk to feed her child until the child reaches the age of one.

History.

2014, c. 380.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2014 act having been § 22.1-79.5.

§ 22.1-79.7.
School meal policies; donations.

Each local school board shall adopt policies that:

Prohibit school board employees from requiring a student who cannot pay for a meal at school or who owes a school meal debt to throw away or discard a meal after it has been served to him, do chores or other work to pay for such meals, or wear a wristband or hand stamp;

Require school board employees to direct any communication relating to a school meal debt to the student’s parent. Such policy may permit such communication to be made by a letter addressed to the parent to be sent home with the student;

Prohibit the school board from filing a lawsuit against a student or the student’s parent because the student cannot pay for a meal at school or owes a school meal debt; and

Prohibit the school board or any school board employee from denying a student the opportunity to participate in any extracurricular school activity because the student cannot pay for a meal at school or owes a school meal debt.

Any school board may solicit and receive any donation or other funds for the purpose of eliminating or offsetting any school meal debt at any time and shall use any such funds solely for such purpose.

History.

2018, cc. 384, 712; 2020, cc. 509, 575; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 106; 2022, c. 686.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 509 inserted “throw away or discard a meal after it has been served to him” in subdivision 1.

The 2020 amendment by c. 575 added subsection B and redesignated the existing provisions as subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 106, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision A 3 and made related changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 686, added subdivision A 4; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-79.7:1.
School meals; availability to students.

Each school board shall require each public elementary and secondary school in the local school division to participate in the federal National School Lunch Program and the federal School Breakfast Program administered by the U.S. Department of Agriculture and to make lunch and breakfast available pursuant to such programs to any student who requests such a meal, regardless of whether such student has the money to pay for the meal or owes money for meals previously provided, unless the student’s parent has provided written permission to the school board to withhold such a meal from the student.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of a school board to collect payment for meals provided pursuant to subsection A, provided, however, that no such school board shall utilize a nongovernmental third-party debt collector to collect on such debt.

History.

2020, c. 683.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 683, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 22.1-79.8.
Policies regarding job assistance for certain persons.

The Department of Education and local school boards shall adopt policies to implement the provisions of 20 U.S.C. § 7926 that prohibit any local school board or any individual who is an employee, contractor, or agent of a local school board from assisting an employee, contractor, or agent of such local school board in obtaining a new job if such local school board or individual knows or has probable cause to believe that the employee, contractor, or agent engaged in sexual misconduct regarding a minor or student in violation of law.

History.

2018, cc. 513, 514.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 513 and 514 were codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 22.1-79.9.
Promotion of broadband services for educational purposes.

As used in this section:“Affordability program” means a program or package of broadband services which may include educational programming or access to educational content, offered by a private broadband service provider to school-age children and their families at a lower price, or with specialized services, compared to the broadband services offered by the private broadband service provider to the general public.“Child nutrition program” means any school meal program funded and regulated by the U.S. Department of Agriculture, including the National School Lunch Program, School Breakfast Program, National School Lunch Program Afterschool Snack Service, Child and Adult Care Food Program, Summer Food Service Program, and Special Milk Program.“Sponsored program” means a financial program to provide lower-cost or free broadband services, or a specialized offering of broadband services, for educational purposes to the home of a student when the student would qualify for (i) a child nutrition program or (ii) any other program recognized or adopted by the local school board as a measuring standard to identify at-risk students.

Any school board may:

Promote and publicize the availability of private broadband services for educational purposes to parents and students, including the availability of any affordability programs or sponsored programs;

Provide promotional or informational materials for private broadband services to parents, students, and potential sponsors including brochures, flyers, and cable, internet, broadband, or other public service announcements, in any media, regarding locally available private broadband service offerings, including the availability of any affordability programs or sponsored programs, to encourage student use of broadband services for educational purposes;

Accept compensation, or in-kind donations of materials and services, from any private broadband service provider to reimburse the school board or other public body for its actual costs incurred in providing the materials described in subdivision 2;

Enter into agreements with local businesses, charitable groups, or private broadband service providers to promote sponsored programs to provide reduced cost or free broadband services for educational purposes to households of qualifying students. Under such agreements, the school board may award grants or subsidies to private broadband service providers to reduce or eliminate the cost of sponsored program broadband services provided to qualifying student households; and

Utilize any federal, state, or local funds that are not otherwise restricted to pay grants or subsidies to support sponsored programs, including any federal funds that may be available through the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act, P.L. 116-36, the Coronavirus Response and Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2021, or similar legislation.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 496.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 22.1-80.
Development of park areas adjacent to public schools.

Whenever an undeveloped or unused public park area owned by the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions exists adjacent to any public school, the school board is authorized and encouraged to develop or improve such area in extension of such school’s programs or facilities, subject to the approval and cooperation of the Commonwealth or political subdivision, as the case may be. In the case of an undeveloped or unused public park area owned by a park authority created by more than one political subdivision, a school board in any such political subdivision is authorized and encouraged to develop or improve such area in extension of its school program or facilities, subject to approval and cooperation of the park authority.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-72.2; 1966, c. 606; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-81.
Annual report.

Unless for good cause shown an extension of time not to exceed fifteen days is granted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, each school board, with the assistance of the division superintendent, shall make a report covering the work of the schools for the year ending the preceding June 30 to the Board of Education according to a timeline and on forms supplied by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-54; 1980, c. 559; 1987, c. 205; 1999, cc. 191, 492; 2022, c. 355.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 191 and 492 are identical, and substituted “September 15” for “August 15.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 deleted “on or before September 15 of each year” preceding “make a report”; inserted “according to a timeline and”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-82.
Employment of counsel to advise or defend school boards and officials; payment of costs, expenses and liabilities; consent of governing bodies required prior to institution of proceedings.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the attorney for the Commonwealth or other counsel may be employed by a school board to advise it concerning any legal matter or to represent it, any member thereof or any school official in any legal proceeding to which the school board, member or official may be a party, when such proceeding is instituted by or against it or against the member or official by virtue of his actions in connection with his duties as such member or official.

All costs and expenses of such advice and all costs, expenses and liabilities of such proceedings shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the school board.

A school board shall, prior to instituting any legal action or proceeding against any other governmental agency in Virginia or expending any funds therefor, first secure the authorization of the governing body of the county, city or town constituting the school division or the governing bodies of the counties or cities in the school division if the division is composed of more than one county or city except as to legal actions or proceedings arising between the school board and the governing body or bodies.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-56.1, 22-72; 1954, c. 289; 1956, Ex. Sess., cc. 60, 63; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1966, c. 691; 1970, c. 71; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1972, c. 511; 1973, cc. 134, 299; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-83.
Payment of employee’s legal fees and expenses.

If an employee of a school board is arrested, indicted or otherwise prosecuted on any charge arising out of any act committed in the discharge of his duties as such employee and such charge is subsequently dismissed or a verdict of not guilty is rendered or if an employee of a school board is made a defendant in any civil action arising out of his actions in connection with his duties as such employee, the school board may pay the legal fees and expenses of such employee.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-56.1:1; 1978, c. 135; 1980, c. 559.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Demurrer. —

Plaintiff was an employee of the school board, prosecuted for allegations regarding sexual abuse of a student, made a defendant in a civil case, and the charge was ultimately reversed; although defendant was not required in every circumstance to pay plaintiff’s fees, this was not an appropriate argument to dismiss plaintiff’s request, and the objection to this count was overruled as the request was sufficient for purposes of demurrer. Evans v. Fairfax Cty. Pub. Sch. Bd., 97 Va. Cir. 192, 2017 Va. Cir. LEXIS 328 (Fairfax County Nov. 21, 2017).

§ 22.1-84.
Insurance.

A school board may provide for insurance on school properties against loss by fire and against such other losses as it deems necessary and may provide liability insurance, or may provide self-insurance, for certain or all of its officers and employees and for student teachers and other persons performing functions or services for any school in the school division, even though any such student teacher or other person performs such functions or services without payment therefor, to cover the costs and expenses incident to liability, including those for settlement, suit or satisfaction of judgment, arising from their conduct in discharging their duties or in performing functions or services for a school. The liability insurance coverage shall be placed with insurance companies authorized to do business in this Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-56.2, 22-72; 1954, c. 289; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 60; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1966, c. 691; 1970, c. 71; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1972, c. 511; 1975, cc. 308, 328; 1976, c. 407; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-85.
Fund for payment of hospital, medical, etc., services provided officers, employees and dependents.

Any school board may establish a fund for the payment of hospital, medical, surgical and related services provided any of its officers, employees and their dependents out of funds appropriated to the school board or by payroll deductions or other mode consistent with state and federal income tax law and regulations.
In addition, any school board may establish a fund for the payment of expenses incurred by its officers and employees for dependent care assistance through payroll deductions or other mode consistent with state and federal income tax law and regulations.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-56.3; 1979, c. 624; 1980, c. 559; 1993, c. 287.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Multiple localities and school boards may create a single voluntary, self-funded trust

to insure health benefits for their employees and the families of their employees as a joint exercise of power. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Emmett W. Hanger, Jr., Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Richard P. Bell, Member, House of Delegates, 12-059, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 38 (10/5/2012).

Unexpended funds. —

Funds contributed by members of local public schools’ Section 125 Flexible Benefits Plan are not “local funds” that are subject to return to the city under §
22.1-100 if not expended during the year. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable L. Louise Lucas, Member, Senate of Virginia, 20-022, 2020 Va. AG LEXIS 38 (12/11/20).

§ 22.1-86.
Meetings of people of school division; local committees.

It shall be the duty of each school board to call meetings of the people of the school division for consultation in regard to the school interests thereof when deemed necessary by the school board. The chairman, if present, or, if not, some other member of the school board shall preside at such meetings.

Each school board is authorized to appoint a committee of not less than three nor more than seven members for each public school in the school division. The committee’s duty shall be to advise the members of the school board with reference to matters pertaining to the school and to cooperate with the school board in the care of the school property and in the successful operation of the school. Such committee shall serve without compensation.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-79; 1952, c. 72; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-86.1.
Appointment of student representatives to local school boards.

The local school board may adopt procedures for the appointment of student representatives from among the students enrolled in the public schools in the division. The student representative shall serve in a nonvoting, advisory capacity and shall be appointed under such circumstances and serve for such terms as the board prescribes.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit any school board from excluding the nonvoting student representative from executive sessions or closed meetings pursuant to §

2.2-3711

.

Student representatives shall not be construed to be members of local school boards for any purpose, including, but not limited to, establishing a quorum or making any official decision.

History.

1999, c. 431.

§ 22.1-87.
Judicial review.

Any parent, custodian, or legal guardian of a pupil attending the public schools in a school division who is aggrieved by an action of the school board may, within thirty days after such action, petition the circuit court having jurisdiction in the school division to review the action of the school board. Such review shall proceed upon the petition, the minutes of the meeting at which the school board’s action was taken, the orders, if any, of the school board, an attested copy of the transcript, if any, of any hearing before the school board, and any other evidence found relevant to the issues on appeal by the court. The action of the school board shall be sustained unless the school board exceeded its authority, acted arbitrarily or capriciously, or abused its discretion.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-57; 1968, c. 139; 1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 229.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Law Review.

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2 Potential Jurisdiction. § 2.03 Courts. Bryson.